Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 543B.16, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The application form prepared or furnished by the real estate commission must allow a person holding a real estate broker license who is applying for a real estate salesperson license, or a person holding a real estate salesperson license who is applying for a real estate broker license, to indicate whether the license being applied for shall become effective upon approval of the application or upon the expiration of the applicantâs current license. Sec. 2. Section 543B.56A, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. A brokerage agreement must be signed by both the broker and the client prior to the broker listing any property for sale on behalf of a seller, or before showing a property to a buyer, or if no property is shown to a buyer, before making an offer on a property on behalf of a buyer. This subsection The brokerage agreement requirements under this subsection that apply to a buyer shall not apply to customers attending an open Senate File 314, p. 2 house or auction, to a potential buyer of a property of more than four dwelling units, or to a property that is not intended for human inhabitance . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 314, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor